District of Columbia statutes.
9-607

Rules.

On or before July 1, 2015, the Mayor, pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. Through rulemaking, the Mayor may also modify the schedule of fines listed in § 9-606. The Mayor shall submit a proposed modification to the schedule of fines to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not disapprove the modification by resolution within the 30-day period, the modification shall be deemed approved.

Sept. 16, 1922, 42 Stat. 845, ch. 318, § 8 [7]
as added Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-211, § 2(d) [e], 61 DCR 13074

History

Section 14 of Pub. L. 93-140, § 14, formerly codified as § 9-607 in the 2001 Ed., is now carried as a note under § 9-602.

Editor's Notes